Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-605
Construction; leasing; improvement; maintenance; management; labor; tax; levy.

For the purpose of the construction, leasing, improvement, maintenance, and management of an aviation field and for the payment of persons employed in the performance of labor in connection therewith, any county may, without a vote of the legal electors, levy an annual tax of not to exceed three and five-tenths cents on each one hundred dollars of taxable value of all the taxable property in such county subject to section 77-3443. No part of the funds so levied and collected shall be used for any other purpose.

Laws 1969, c. 141, § 5, p. 649;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 15;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 13;

Laws 1996, LB 1114, § 20.